Virginia statutes. Title 61.1. Warehouses, Cold Storage and Refrigerated Locker Plants.
Chapter 1. Warehouse Receipts.

§ 61.1-1.
Issue of receipt for goods not received.

A warehouseman, or any officer, agent or servant of a warehouseman, who issues or aids in issuing a receipt knowing that the goods for which such receipt is issued have not been actually received by such warehouseman, or are not under his actual control at the time of issuing such receipt, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punished as provided in §

18.2-12

.

History.

Code 1950, § 61-53; 1968, c. 69.

Cross references.

For provisions of Uniform Commercial Code relating to warehouse receipts, bills of lading and other documents of title, see §§

8.7-101

through

8.7-603

.

Transition provisions.

At its regular session of 1966 the General Assembly directed the Code Commission to revise certain titles of the Code, including Title 61, relating to warehouses, cold storage and refrigerated locker plants. In June of 1967 the Commission sent to the Governor and General Assembly its report containing the proposed revision of Title 61, which was published as House Document 4 of the 1968 session. This report contained revisor’s notes and other explanatory matter, which, while valuable, are too lengthy for inclusion here. The Commission’s draft of the revision of Title 61, as amended by the General Assembly, became chapter 69 of the Acts of 1968. Effective Oct. 1, 1968, it repealed Title 61 of the Code and enacted a new Title 61.1.

Many of the cases cited in the notes under the various sections of this title were decided under corresponding provisions of former Title 61.

Acts 1968, c. 69, clauses 3-5 and 7, provide as follows:

“3. All acts and parts of acts, all sections of the Code of Virginia, and all provisions of municipal charters inconsistent with the provisions of this act are, except as otherwise provided, repealed to the extent of such inconsistency.

“4. The repeal of Title 61 effective as of October 1, 1968, shall not affect any act or offense done or committed, or any penalty or forfeiture incurred, or any right established, accrued or accruing on or before such date, or any prosecution, suit or action pending on that date. Except as in this act otherwise provided, neither the repeal of Title 61 of the Code of Virginia nor the enactment of Title 61.1 shall apply to offenses committed prior to October 1, 1968, and prosecutions for such offenses shall be governed by the prior law, which is continued in effect for that purpose. For the purposes of this act, an offense was committed prior to October 1, 1968, if any of the essential elements of the offense occurred prior thereto.

“5. Whenever in Title 61.1 any of the conditions, requirements, provisions or contents of any section, article or chapter of Title 61, as such title existed prior to October 1, 1968, are transferred in the same or in modified form to a new section, article or chapter of Title 61.1, and whenever any such former section, article or chapter of Title 61 is given a new number in Title 61.1, all references to any such former section, article or chapter of Title 61 appearing elsewhere in the Code of Virginia than in Title 61.1 shall be construed to apply to the new or renumbered section, article or chapter containing such conditions, requirements, provisions or contents or portions thereof.

“7. It is the intention of the General Assembly that this act shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes set out herein, and if any clause, sentence, paragraph or section of this act shall ever be declared unconstitutional, it shall be deemed severable, and the remainder of this act shall continue in full force and effect.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

19 M.J. Warehouses and Warehousemen, §§ 1, 7.

§ 61.1-2.
Issue of receipt containing false statement.

A warehouseman, or any officer, agent or servant of a warehouseman, who fraudulently issues or aids in fraudulently issuing a receipt for goods knowing that it contains any false statement, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punished as provided in §

18.2-12

.

History.

Code 1950, § 61-54; 1968, c. 69.

§ 61.1-3.
Issue of duplicate receipts not so marked.

A warehouseman, or any officer, agent or servant of a warehouseman, who issues or aids in issuing a duplicate or additional negotiable receipt for goods, knowing that a former negotiable receipt for the same goods or any part of them is outstanding and uncanceled, without plainly placing upon the face thereof the word “Duplicate,” except as otherwise provided by law, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 61-55; 1968, c. 69.

§ 61.1-4.
Failure to state in receipt warehouseman’s interest in goods.

Where there are deposited with or held by a warehouseman goods of which he is the owner, either solely or jointly in common with others, such warehouseman, or any of his officers, agents or servants, who knowing this ownership, issues or aids in issuing a negotiable receipt for such goods which does not state such ownership, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be punished as provided for misdemeanors generally in §

18.2-12

.

History.

Code 1950, § 61-56; 1968, c. 69.

§ 61.1-5.
Delivery of goods without obtaining negotiable receipt.

A warehouseman, or any officer, agent or servant of a warehouseman, who delivers goods out of the possession of such warehouseman, knowing that a negotiable receipt the negotiation of which would transfer the right to the possession of such goods is outstanding and uncanceled, without obtaining the possession of such receipt at or before the time of such delivery, shall, except as otherwise provided by law, be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be punished as provided in §

18.2-12

.

History.

Code 1950, § 61-57; 1968, c. 69.

§ 61.1-6.
Fraudulent negotiation of receipt for mortgaged goods.

Any person who deposits goods to which he has not title, upon which there is a lien or security interest, and who takes for such goods a negotiable receipt which he afterwards negotiates for value with intent to deceive, and without disclosing his want of title or the existence of the lien or security interest, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be punished as provided in §

18.2-12

.

History.

Code 1950, § 61-58; 1968, c. 69.